Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5705
Notice to prospective insured; exception.

The controlling producer, prior to the effective date of the policy, shall deliver written notice to the prospective insured disclosing the relationship between the controlling producer and the controlled insurer, except that if the business is placed through a subproducer who is not a controlling producer, the controlling producer shall retain in his or her records a signed commitment from the subproducer that the subproducer is aware of the relationship between the controlled insurer and the controlling producer and that the subproducer has or will notify the insured.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 72.